New Jersey, session 221, A1488.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Except as provided in subsection b. of this section, any public or private entity of this State shall not collect, retain, convert, store, or share any biometric identifier information. b.    A public or private entity of this State may collect a persons biometric identifier information if the public or private entity posts clear and conspicuous notice, written in plain language, at every common entryway regarding its use of a biometric surveillance system. c.     Any public or private entity of this State that violates the provisions of this section shall be liable to a civil administrative penalty of $5,000 for a first offense and $10,000 for any second or subsequent violation, which shall be collected by the Attorney General in a summary proceeding pursuant to the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  In addition, any pattern of violations of the provisions of this section shall constitute a fourth-degree crime.  A pattern of violations shall be established when a public or private entity is found to have committed five or more violations of the provisions of this section, provided that each violation occurs on a separate day within the same thirty-day period.  A subsequent violation of the provisions of this section committed by a public or private entity after having been convicted of a fourth-degree crime shall be a third-degree crime. d.    As used in this section: Biometric identifier information means any data collected through a biometric surveillance system that assists in identifying a person or capturing information about a person based on the persons unique physical characteristics or traits. Biometric surveillance system means any computer system or software that collects biometric identifier information using various methods, including, but not limited, to facial, iris, retina, voice, fingerprint, or palm recognition technologies. "Private entity" means any person other than a public entity. "Public entity" means the State, any county, municipality, district, public authority, public agency, and any other political subdivision or public body in the State. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month following enactment.